District of Columbia statutes.
8-404

Registered technicians.

(a)

No person, except those acting as a private applicator or licensed as a commercial applicator, public applicator, or registered technician shall apply any pesticide in the District for a fee.

(b)

The application to become a licensed registered technician shall be made in writing on a form prescribed by the Mayor, and the registration shall be valid for the time period prescribed by the Mayor. The Mayor shall, by regulation, establish appropriate education and training requirements for registration as a registered technician.

(c)

The Mayor shall provide for the issuance of appropriate credentials for all registrants.

Apr. 18. 1978, D.C. Law 2-70, § 5, 24 DCR 6867
Oct. 23, 2012, D.C. Law 19-191, § 12(c), 59 DCR 10166
This section is referenced in § 8-401 and § 8-408.
1981 Ed., § 6-751.4.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-191 rewrote this section.
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-191: Section 14(a) of D.C. Law 19-191 provided that §§ 1 through 5 and 8 through 13 of the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.